District of Columbia statutes.
36-408

Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to make uniform the law with respect to trade secrets among the District of Columbia and those states enacting it.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-216, § 9, 36 DCR 519
1981 Ed., § 48-508.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 8 of the Uniform Trade Secrets Act.